California statutes. Education Code
 for the initiative in order to monitor progress and provide leadership from the perspectives of their respective participating organizations, departments, and divisions and to facilitate collaboration among researchers, practitioners, administrators, legislators, and community stakeholders.

(2) The advisory board shall provide expertise and support to the management committee.

(3) The advisory board shall be a check on accountability to ensure that the initiative is meeting its goals.

(4) The advisory board shall conduct a fiscal review of the distribution of funds to ensure alignment with the goals of the initiative.

(5) The membership of the advisory board
 shall be constituted as set forth in subdivision (c).

(c) The members of the advisory board shall be representatives from the following institutions, organizations, agencies, and groups:

(1) UCSF.

(2) UC college named in Section 92200.

(3) The UC/CSU California Collaborative for Learning and Neurodiversity.

(4) The Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission.

(5) A Member of the Assembly selected by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(6) A Senator
 selected by the President pro Tempore of the Senate.

(7) Community representatives, including formerly justice-involved persons and their family members, selected by the Governor, the Speaker of the Assembly, and the President pro Tempore of the Senate.

(d) (1) The advisory board shall meet twice per year, with the potential for additional working group meetings.

(2) At each meeting, the advisory board shall participate in a review of reports, including updates on research, practice, and policy efforts, as well as fiscal reporting.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health
 Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 4.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. The Early Assessment Program [99300. - 99301.]

99300.

(a) (1) Commencing with the 2014–15 school year and for purposes of the Early Assessment Program established by this chapter, the California Standards Test and the augmented California Standards Tests in English language arts and mathematics may be replaced with the grade 11 consortium computer-adaptive assessments in English language arts and mathematics.

(2) The Legislature finds and declares that in 2004, the California State University (CSU) established the Early Assessment Program (EAP), a collaborative effort among the State Board of Education, the State Department of Education, and CSU, to enable pupils to learn
 about their readiness for college-level English and mathematics before their senior year of high school. It is the intent of the Legislature that the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, the State Board of Education, and the State Department of Education work together to modify the existing EAP to expand it to include the California Community Colleges (CCC) so that, beginning in the 2009–10 school year, high school juniors who are considering attending either system can take the EAP and receive information in the summer before their senior year concerning their preparation for college-level work at both CSU and CCC.

(b) It is also the intent of the Legislature that the existing EAP student notification system, as currently operated by agreement between
 CSU and the State Department of Education, be modified to do both of the following:

(1) Reassure pupils that they are eligible to attend a community college and that taking the EAP test has no bearing on their eligibility to attend a community college.

(2) Inform pupils of their readiness for college-level coursework in English or mathematics, or both, and recommend the next appropriate steps as they pertain to achieving success at a community college, similar to how CSU communicates with pupils who take the EAP test and are prospective CSU students.

(c) It is also the intent of the Legislature that the EAP be
 modified to include all of the following requirements:

(1) That the participating community college districts utilize the existing EAP secure data repository and clearinghouse for test score distribution of the assessment, as referenced in Section 60641.

(2) That the modified EAP not affect the statutory reporting requirements provided in Section 60641, or increase the costs of either the assessment program referenced in Section 60640 or the State Department of Education.

(3) That the modified EAP be titled the “Early Assessment Program.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 489, Sec. 27.   (AB 484)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

99301.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 78213, the individual grade 11 assessment results, as referenced in Section 60641, or a standards-aligned successor assessment, in addition to any other purposes, may be used by community college districts to provide diagnostic advice to, or for the placement of, prospective community college students participating in the EAP.

(b) (1) As authorized pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 60641, the individual assessment results, as referenced in Section 60641, or a standards-aligned successor assessment, shall be provided to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(2) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall coordinate with community college districts that choose to voluntarily participate in the EAP as follows, and, to the extent possible, shall accomplish all of the following activities using existing resources:

(A) Encourage community college districts to choose to voluntarily participate in the EAP and notify them of the requirements of subdivision (c), including the requirements that the standards utilized by CSU to assess readiness for college-level English and mathematics courses, as expressed in the assessment referenced in Section 60641, or a standards-aligned successor assessment, shall also be used for the purposes of the EAP.

(B) Coordinate the progress of the program, provide technical assistance to participating community college
 districts pursuant to subdivision (c) as needed, identify additional reporting and program criteria as needed, and provide a report to the Legislature and Governor on or before February 15, 2015, on the implementation and results of the EAP for community college students.

(C) Provide access to the individual assessment results, as referenced in Section 60641, or a standards-aligned successor assessment, to participating community college districts.

(c) For those community college districts that choose to work directly with high school pupils within their respective district boundaries who took the assessment, as referenced in Section 60641, or a standards-aligned successor assessment, and choose to offer assistance to these pupils in strengthening their college readiness skills, all of the following provisions apply:

(1) The individual results of the assessment, as referenced in Section 60641, or a standards-aligned successor assessment, shall be released by the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, as authorized pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 60641, to participating community college districts upon their request for this information and may be used to provide diagnostic advice to prospective community college students participating in the EAP.

(2) Pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the same standards utilized by CSU to assess readiness shall also be used for purposes of this section.

(3) The assessment, as referenced in Section 60641, and utilized by CSU for purposes of early assessment, or a standards-aligned successor assessment, shall be used to assess the college readiness of
 pupils in the EAP.

(4) Participating community college districts are encouraged to consult with the Academic Senate for the California Community Colleges to work toward sequencing their precollegiate level courses and transfer-level courses in English and mathematics to the common core academic content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605.8.

(5) Participating community college districts shall identify an EAP coordinator and shall coordinate with CSU campuses and schools offering instruction in kindergarten and any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, in their respective district boundaries on EAP-related activities that assist pupils in making decisions that increase their college readiness skills and likelihood of pursuing a postsecondary education.

(6) In order to provide high school pupils with an indicator of
 their college readiness, a community college district participating in the EAP shall use individual assessment results provided to that college pursuant to paragraph (1) of, and subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of, subdivision (b) to provide diagnostic advice to prospective community college students participating in the EAP.

(7) The individual results of the assessment, as referenced in Section 60641 for purposes of the EAP, or a standards-aligned successor assessment, shall not be used by a community college as a criterion for admission.

(8) Participating community college districts shall utilize the existing infrastructure of academic opportunities, as developed by CSU, to provide additional preparation in grade 12 for prospective community college students participating in the EAP.

(d) Both of the following
 provisions apply to CSU:

(1) The individual results of the assessment, as referenced in Section 60641, or a standards-aligned successor assessment, as authorized pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 60641, shall be released to, and, in addition to any other purposes, may be used by, CSU to provide diagnostic advice to, or for the placement of, prospective CSU students participating in the EAP.

(2) The individual results of the assessment, as referenced in Section 60641 for purposes of the EAP, or a standards-aligned successor assessment, shall not be used by CSU as a criterion for admission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 47.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. California Education Learning Laboratory [99350. - 99352.]

99350.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Adaptive learning” means a technology-mediated environment in which the learner’s experience is adapted to learner behavior and responses.

(b) “Agency” means the Government Operations Agency.

(c) “Learning lab” means the California Education Learning Laboratory established in this chapter.

(d) “Public postsecondary educational institution” means a campus of the California Community Colleges, the California State University, or the University of California.

(e) “Public postsecondary segment” means the California Community Colleges, the California State University, or the University of California.

(f) “STEM” means science, technology, engineering, and mathematics.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 84, Sec. 2.   (SB 172)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

99351.

(a) The California Education Learning Laboratory is hereby established as a program under the Government Operations Agency. The purpose of the learning lab is to increase learning outcomes and close equity and achievement gaps using the science of human learning and adaptive learning technologies in STEM disciplines and other disciplines.

(b) (1) In administering this chapter, the agency shall issue calls for, evaluate, and annually award grants to competitive grant proposals from intersegmental faculty teams that apply principles of the science of human learning and adaptive learning technologies in STEM disciplines and other disciplines, based on, but not limited to, all of the following criteria:

(A) The potential for reducing achievement and equity gaps in the particular discipline or subject area that is the subject of the call for proposals.

(B) The depth and breadth of expertise in the discipline or subject area described in subparagraph (A).

(C) The prospects for increasing equity and accessibility in STEM disciplines and other subject areas that show high initial failure or dropout rates.

(D) The potential to incorporate real-time learning outcome data to improve the curriculum.

(E) The potential to use a common technology platform to deliver the course or course series.

(F) The representation of each public
 postsecondary segment on the proposal’s faculty team.

(G) The inclusion of career education and workforce pathways in the proposal.

(H) Opportunities to leverage nonstate funding.

(I) The quality of the concrete metrics and goals identified in the proposal.

(2) The agency shall monitor the progress of proposals awarded grants pursuant to this chapter.

(3) (A) The agency shall recruit an expert selection committee to score and recommend proposals to the agency.

(B) Members of the selection committee described in subparagraph (A) shall not have a financial interest in any contract, including any
 recommendation to award grants made by the selection committee described in subparagraph (A).

(C) The selection committee shall comply with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except during the deliberative process as it relates to scoring, reviewing, and ranking proposals, and the making of final recommendations to the agency.

(c) The agency shall create, and post on its internet website, the guidelines for awarding grants described in subdivision (b). The guidelines shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A competitive and merit-based application process that allows faculty from public postsecondary educational institutions to submit proposals. For the first three years that
 proposals are accepted, the agency shall select STEM disciplines from which to award proposals. The agency may limit the number of proposals submitted by a public postsecondary educational institution or solicit proposals by invitation only for limited calls for proposal.

(2) A peer-reviewed proposal selection process.

(3) Eligibility requirements, which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) A minimum number of public postsecondary segments shall be represented by each proposal’s intersegmental faculty team members.

(B) A minimum number of faculty team members shall commit to teaching or evaluating codeveloped or jointly redesigned curriculum during the grant period.

(C) A proposal may include faculty from independent institutions of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, or nonfaculty, as appropriate.

(4) Requirements regarding the use of awarded grants, including, but not limited to, a cap on indirect cost rates.

(5) Requirements regarding the use and sharing of research data and findings.

(6) Requirements for the protection of privacy and personal information.

(d) (1) The agency may, in addition to the grants awarded pursuant to this section, do both of the following:

(A) Award learning lab grants for professional development to faculty, including, but not limited to, grants to adopt a successful course or
 course series developed or redesigned through the learning lab.

(B) Curate a “best of” resource library of curricular and pedagogical assets, including from grants that have demonstrated successful outcomes.

(2) The agency shall create, and post on its internet website, guidelines for awarding grants pursuant to this chapter.

(e) The agency shall solicit public, nonprofit, and private sector input on any additional guidelines for awarding grants pursuant to this article.

(f) The agency shall establish terms and conditions that require learning lab courses and course series, and technology and technology platforms developed or redesigned with learning lab grants, to be available as open education resources.

(g) (1) The agency shall annually submit a report to the Legislature that summarizes the grants awarded pursuant to this chapter. The report shall include evaluations of completed proposal projects. Multiple project evaluations may be submitted in one report.

(2) A written report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(h) The agency may receive nonstate funds to support the operations of the learning lab, to make additional funds available for purposes of this chapter, or to increase the amount of grants previously awarded to a learning lab proposal.

(i) (1) The agency may use up to 5 percent of any amount appropriated to the agency for the
 learning lab for the administrative costs of implementing this chapter.

(2) The evaluation of a project for purposes of the report described in subdivision (g) is not an administrative cost for purposes of this subdivision.

(3) The curation of the resource library described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) is not an administrative cost for purposes of this subdivision.

(j) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the agency may implement or interpret this chapter without taking any regulatory action.

(k) The agency may enter into an agreement with an entity, or with a nonprofit or not-for-profit organization, or a consortium of those organizations, for purposes of administering or jointly administering this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 84, Sec. 2.   (SB 172)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

99352.

The agency shall award learning lab grant funding in compliance with both of the following:

(a) Learning lab grant funding shall be awarded to public postsecondary educational institutions geographically located in California.

(b) Recipients of learning lab grant funding shall include, but are not limited to, public postsecondary educational institutions in both northern and southern
 California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 255, Sec. 4.   (AB 184)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 66. PUBLIC EDUCATION BONDS [100000. - 100185.]



  CHAPTER 1. Public Education Facilities Bond Act of 1996 [100000. - 100185.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [100000. - 100000.]

100000.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Public Education Facilities Bond Act of 1996.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. School Facilities Program Provisions [100010. - 100035.]

100010.

Two billion twelve million thirty-five thousand dollars ($2,012,035,000) of the proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, and approved in Prop. 203 on March 26, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

100015.

All moneys deposited in the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund shall be available to provide aid to school districts of the state in accordance with the Leroy F. Greene State School Building Lease-Purchase Law of 1976 (Chapter 22 (commencing with Section 17700) of Part 10), and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto, to provide aid to school districts, county superintendents of schools, and county boards of education of the state in accordance with Sections 100020, 100025, 100030, and 100035, to provide funds to repay any money advanced or loaned to the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund under any act of the Legislature, together with interest provided for in that act, and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100020.

Of the proceeds from the sale of bonds pursuant to this chapter, not more than nine hundred million dollars ($900,000,000) may be used for one or more of the following purposes:

(a) The acquisition of portable classrooms for use in accordance with Chapter 25 (commencing with Section 17785) of Part 10.

(b) The reconstruction or modernization of facilities pursuant to Chapter 22 (commencing with Section 17700) of Part 10. In addition to the current program requirements, the State Allocation Board may allocate funding pursuant to this subdivision for the reconstruction or modernization of any existing structure, including the wiring and cabling in that structure, to enable that structure to accommodate computers and other high technology equipment.

(c) The purchase and installation of air-conditioning equipment and insulation materials, and related costs, pursuant to Section 42250.1, for schools operated on a year-round multitrack schedule in a manner that increases school capacity and reduces or eliminates the school district’s need for the construction of additional classroom space.

(d) Project funding for applicant districts under Chapter 22 (commencing with Section 17700) of Part 10 that have incurred or will incur enrollment increases due to the locating or expansion of state or federal prisons.

(e) The acquisition of relocatable child care and development facilities for the purpose of providing extended day care services pursuant to Article 22 (commencing with Section 8460) of Chapter 2 of Part 6.

(f) Project funding, without regard to funding priorities, for applicant county boards of education under Chapter 22 (commencing with Section 17700) of Part 10 that are eligible for that funding for classrooms for severely handicapped pupils.

(g) Project funding for applicant districts under Chapter 22 (commencing with Section 17700) of Part 10 that are eligible for that funding, but that lack funding priority due to the size of pupil enrollment in the district.

(h) Project funding for high priority roof replacement projects.

(i) Construction projects or the purchase of furniture or equipment designed to increase school security.

(j) The identification, assessment, or abatement in school facilities of hazardous asbestos pursuant to either Chapter 22 (commencing with Section 17700) of Part 10 or Section 39619.6 and of lead.

(k) The reconstruction or modernization of facilities pursuant to Chapter 22 (commencing with Section 17700) of Part 10. Notwithstanding Section 17721.3, the State Allocation Board may allocate funding pursuant to this subdivision for the reconstruction or modernization of an existing structure in an amount that exceeds 25 percent of the replacement cost of that structure in order to finance structural improvements needed to avert future earthquake damage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100025.

Of the proceeds from the sale of bonds pursuant to this chapter, not more than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) may be used for seismic retrofit projects of existing public school facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100030.

Of the proceeds from the sale of bonds pursuant to this chapter, not more than forty million dollars ($40,000,000) may be used for projects for school districts that agree to contribute 60 percent or more of the cost of those projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100035.

Of the proceeds from the sale of bonds pursuant to this chapter, not more than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) may be used for projects that include joint use of facilities pursuant to Section 17750 or 17751.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Higher Education Facilities Program [100110. - 100121.]

100110.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California’s economic and social prosperity relies on a higher education system that keeps pace with California’s growth. In the coming decades, the state’s economic prosperity will depend on increasing the productivity of the work force and on the ability to compete successfully in the world marketplace.

(b) The system of public higher education in this state includes the University of California, comprising 9 campuses, the California State University, comprising 22 campuses, including the California Maritime Academy, a specialized institution, the California Community Colleges, consisting of 71 districts and 107
 campuses, the college named in Section 92200, and their respective off-campus centers. Each of these institutions plays a vital role in maintaining California’s dominance in higher education in the United States.

(c) Over the last several years, studies have been completed by the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges to assess their long-term and short-term capital needs. Those studies demonstrate that the long-term and short-term needs total, in the aggregate, several billion dollars.

(d) The purpose of this article is to assist in meeting the capital outlay financing needs of California’s public higher education system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 31.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

100115.

Nine hundred seventy-five million dollars ($975,000,000) of the proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the 1996 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund, which is hereby created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 3.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, and approved in Prop. 203 on March 26, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

100120.

(a) The Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee created pursuant to Section 67353 shall be and is hereby authorized to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of funding aid to the University of California, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, and the college named in Section 92200 for the construction, including the construction of buildings and the acquisition of related fixtures; the equipping of new, renovated, or reconstructed facilities; funding for the payment of preconstruction costs, including, but not limited to, preliminary plans and working drawings; renovation and reconstruction of facilities; and the construction or improvement of off-campus facilities of the
 California State University approved by the Trustees of the California State University on or before July 1, 1990, including the acquisition of sites upon which these facilities are to be constructed.

(b) The addition of the college named in Section 92200 to this section is not intended to mark a change from the funding authorizations made by Section 67354, as contained in the Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of 1986, or Section 67334, as contained in the Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of 1988, but is intended to state more clearly what was intended by the Legislature in those sections as well.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 32.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

100121.

The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall consider the historic significance of community college district buildings that are 50 years of age or older if those buildings are to be renovated, reconstructed, or demolished in connection with the construction of buildings utilizing the funds provided by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Fiscal Provisions [100125. - 100180.]

100125.

(a) Bonds in the total amount of two billion nine hundred eighty-seven million thirty-five thousand dollars ($2,987,035,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 100175, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and
 interest become due and payable.

(b) Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee created pursuant to Section 67353 at any different times necessary to service expenditures required by the apportionments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 5.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, and approved in Prop. 203 on March 26, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

100130.

The State School Building Finance Committee, created by Section 15909 and composed of the Governor, Controller, Treasurer, Director of Finance, and the Superintendent of Public Instruction, or their designated representatives, all of whom shall serve thereon without compensation, and a majority of whom shall constitute a quorum, is continued in existence for the purpose of this chapter. The Treasurer shall be designated to chair the committee. Two Members of the Senate appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and two Members of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, shall meet with and provide advice to the committee to the extent that the advisory participation is not incompatible with their respective positions as Members of the Legislature. For the purposes of this chapter, the Members of the Legislature shall constitute an interim investigating committee on the subject of this chapter and, as that committee, shall have the powers and duties imposed upon those committees by the Joint Rules of the Senate and the Assembly. The Director of Finance shall provide the assistance to the committee as it may require. The Attorney General of the state shall be the legal adviser of the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100135.

(a) The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the State Allocation Board is designated the “board” for purposes of administering the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund.

(c) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, each state agency administering an appropriation of the 1996 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund is designated as the “board” for projects funded by those appropriations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100140.

(a) Upon request of the State Allocation Board from time to time, supported by a statement of the apportionments made and to be made for the purposes described in Sections 100015, 100020, 100025, 100030, and 100035, the State School Building Finance Committee created pursuant to Section 15909 shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to fund the apportionments and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to fund those apportionments progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(b) The Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee created pursuant to Section 67353 shall authorize the issuance of bonds under this chapter only to the extent necessary to fund the apportionments for the purposes described in Section 100120 that are expressly authorized by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act. Pursuant to that legislative direction, the committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to carry out the actions specified in Section 100120 and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100145.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year, and it is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100150.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum that is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 100165, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100155.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The board shall execute those documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100160.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), if the Treasurer sells bonds that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes subject to designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and for the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds that is required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100165.

(a) For the purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized by the State School Building Finance Committee or the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund and the 1996 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, plus an amount equal to the interest the money would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(b) Any request forwarded to the Legislature and the Department of Finance for funds from this bond issue for expenditure for the purposes described in Section 100120 by the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges shall be accompanied by the five-year capital outlay plan of the particular university or college and shall include a schedule that prioritizes the seismic retrofitting needed to significantly reduce, by the 2002–03 fiscal year, in the judgment of the particular university or college, seismic hazards in buildings identified as high priority by the university or college.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100170.

All money deposited in the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund, the Education Technology Fund, and the 1996 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100175.
